Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-351
Unauthorized sale or possession of pickle cards; violation; penalty.

(1) No person or organization other than those qualifying under section 9-326 and licensed pursuant to section 9-327 shall be permitted to conduct a lottery by the sale of pickle cards in this state.

(2) No person other than a licensed distributor or manufacturer shall possess pickle cards that are not properly printed with the information required in section 9-346.

(3) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 44;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 51;

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 31;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-179;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 117.